en: darf everlast, immortelle
hr: darf everlast
it: darf everlast
la: Helichrysum arenarium
tr: altın otu

en: olive leaf
hr: list masline
it: foglia di olivo
nl: olijfblad
tr: zeytin yaprağı

en: myrtle leaf
it: foglia di mirto
tr: mersin yaprağı

en: Corchorus olitorius, Jute mallow, bush okra, krinkrin, etinyung, mulkhiyah
it: corchorus olitorius
ja: シマツナソ, モロヘイヤ

en: mate, yerba mate leaves, yerba mate
af: Mate
ar: متة
be: Матэ
bg: Мате
br: Mate
ca: mate
cs: maté
cy: Mate
da: Mate
de: Mate
eo: Mateo
es: Mate, yerba mate
et: Mate
eu: Mate
fi: Mate
fo: Mate
fr: maté, yerba mate, feuilles de mate
gl: Mate
gn: Ka'ay
he: מאטה
hr: pariti
hu: Matétea
hy: Մատե
id: Mate
it: mate, Erba mate, yerba mate
ja: マテ茶
ka: მატე
ko: 마테차
lt: Matė
lv: Matē
nb: mate
nl: Maté, yerba maté
nn: maté
oc: Mate
os: Мате
pa: ਮੇਟ
pl: Yerba mate, mate, liście mate, liści mate
pt: chimarrão, erva-mate
qu: Mati upyana
ro: Mate
ru: Мате
sk: Maté
sl: Mate
sr: Мате чај
sv: Mate
tl: Mate
tr: Maté
uk: Мате
zh: 瑪黛茶

en: organic yerba mate leaves, organic yerba mate
es: yerba mate orgánica
it: foglie di yerba mate biologica

en: yerba mate extract
es: extracto de yerba mate
hr: yerba mate ekstrakt
it: estratto di yerba mate
pl: ekstrakt z mate, ekstrakt z liści mate, ekstrakt yerba mate

en: meadowsweet
ar: إكليلية المروج
az: Qarağacyarpaq quşqonmaz
ba: Еркәүек
bg: обикновено орехче
ca: reina dels prats
cs: tužebník jilmový
cy: Erwain
da: Almindelig Mjødurt
de: Echtes Mädesüß
et: angervaks, harilik angervaks
eu: Nasai-lore
fa: اسپیره
fi: Mesiangervo
fr: reine des prés
ga: Airgead luachra
gl: Herba ulmeira
hr: končara
hu: Réti legyezőfű
is: Mjaðjurt
it: olmaria
ja: セイヨウナツユキソウ
la: Filipendula ulmaria
li: Moerasspirea
lt: Pelkinė vingiorykštė
lv: Parastā vīgrieze
mk: медуника
nb: Mjødurt
nl: Moerasspirea
nn: Mjødurt
pl: Wiązówka błotna
ro: Crețușcă
ru: Таволга вязолистная
sk: túžobník brestový
sl: Brestovolistni oslad
sr: Суручица
sv: Älggräs
uk: Гадючник в'язолистий
zh: 旋果蚊草子

en: olive, olives
ar: الزيتون
bg: маслини, маслина
bo: རྒྱ་ཨར།
ca: oliva
cs: oliva, olivy
da: oliven
de: Oliven, Olive, Olivenfrucht
eo: olivo
es: aceituna
et: Oliiv, oliivid
eu: Oliba
fi: oliivi, oliivit
fr: olives, olive
gl: Oliva
gn: Tarumaite'a
he: זית
hr: masline, maslina
hu: olajbogyó
ia: Oliva
it: olive, oliva
ja: オリーブ
ln: Olive
lv: olīva
mk: маслинка
mt: żebbuġa
nl: olijven, olijf
nn: oliven
no: oliven
oc: Oliva
pl: oliwki, oliwka, oliwek, oliwkowy, oliwkowa, oliwkowe
pt: axeitonas, azeitona, azeitonas
qu: Asitunas
ro: măslină, măsline
ru: маслины, оливка
sk: oliva, olivy
sv: oliv, oliver
th: นํ้า
tr: zeytin
tt: зәйтүн
zh: 阿塞图纳

en: Koroneiki, Koroneiki olives
xx: Koroneiki
pl: oliwki Koroneiki

en: Halkidiki olive, Halkidiki olives
xx: Prasines Elies Chalkidikis
da: halkidikioliven
el: Πράσινες Ελιές Χαλκιδικής
it: olive Halkidiki
pl: oliwki Halkidiki, oliwki Chalkidiki
sv: halkidikioliv, halkidikioliver

en: green olive, green olives
bg: зелени маслини
ca: oliva verda, oliva mançanenca verda
da: Grønne oliven
de: Grüne Oliven
es: aceituna verde, aceitunas verdes, olivas verdes
fi: vihreä oliivi
fr: olive verte, olives vertes
hr: zelene masline
it: olive verdi
ja: グリーンオリーブ
lv: zaļā olīva
nl: groene olijven
no: grønn oliven, grønne oliven
pl: zielone oliwki, zielona oliwka, zielonych oliwek, oliwki zielone
ru: Зелёные оливки
sv: gröna oliver
tr: yeşil zeytin

en: pitted green olives
bg: обезкостени зелени маслини
de: grüne entsteinte Oliven, Grüne Oliven eintsteint
fr: olives vertes dénoyautées
hr: zelene masline bez koštice
it: olive verdi denocciolate
nl: ontpitte groene olijven

en: green olives with pits
de: Grüne Oliven mit Stein
es: aceitunas verdes con huesos
hr: zelene masline s košticom
it: olive verdi con nocciolo

en: green and black olives, black and green olives
bg: зелени и черни маслини, черни и зелени маслини
de: grüne und schwarze Oliven
es: aceitunas verdes y negras, aceitunas negras y verdes, aceituna verde y negra
fi: vihreä ja musta oliivi, vihreät ja mustat oliivit
fr: olives vertes et noires
hr: zelene i crne masline
it: olive verdi e nere
no: grønne og svarte oliven

en: black olive
bg: черни маслини, черна маслина
ca: oliva negra
da: Sorte oliven
de: schwarze Oliven
es: aceituna negra, oliva negra
fi: musta oliivi
fr: olives noires, olive noire
hr: crne masline, crne odgorčene stolne masline
it: olive nere
nl: zwarte olijven, zwarte olijf
no: svart oliven, svarte oliven, sort oliven, sorte oliven
pl: czarne oliwki, czarna oliwka, czarnych oliwek, oliwka czarna, oliwki czarne
pt: azeitonas pretas
sv: svarta oliver
tr: siyah zeytin

en: olive natural flavouring
hr: prirodni ekstrakt iz plodova masline
it: aroma naturale di oliva

en: olive paté
de: Olivenpastete
fi: oliivimassa
fr: pâte d'olives
hr: pašteta od maslina
it: paté di olive
sv: olivmassa

en: kalamata olive
bg: маслини каламата
de: Kalamata Oliven
es: aceituna kalamata
fi: kalamata-oliivi, kalamataoliivi
fr: Olive de Kalamata
hr: kalamata maslina
it: olive Kalamata
pl: oliwki Kalamata, oliwek Kalamata

en: kalamon olive
bg: маслини каламон, каламон
de: kalamon oliven
es: aceitunas kalamon
fi: kalamon-oliivi, kalamonoliivi
fr: olives noires kalamon
hr: kalamon maslina
it: oliva Kalamon
pl: oliwki kalamon
sv: kalamonoliver